Maine, session 132, LD199.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §682, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 109, §1, is further
amended by repealing the first blocked paragraph and enacting the following in its place:
These limitations do not prohibit a candidate from attending the voting place and orally
communicating with voters the name of the office that the candidate is seeking on the ballot
for the election that day and the party or political designation of the candidate as listed on
the ballot for the election that day as long as the candidate does not attempt to influence
their vote.